Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.314

Christmas tree program—Advisory committee. (Expires July 1, 2030.)

(1) An advisory committee is established to advise the director in the administration of the Christmas tree program.

(2) When appointing this committee, the director shall consider names submitted by Christmas tree growers and by established Christmas tree grower associations having members in the state.

(3) The committee consists of no fewer than five members, representing the interests of licensed Christmas tree growers and the Christmas tree industry, and the director or the director's designee.

(4) The terms of the members of the committee shall be staggered and the members shall serve a term of three years or until their successor has been appointed.

(5) In the event a committee member resigns, is disqualified, or vacates a position on the committee for any other reason, the vacancy shall be filled by the director under the provisions of this section governing appointments.

[ 2007 c 335 s 8.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.